Arkansas, session 2025, HB1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to limit the applicability of
this act to only the aggregate five thousand dollars ($5,000) in medical and
hospital benefits under § 23-89-202(1).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-89-207 is amended to read as follows:
23-89-207. Insurer's right of reimbursement.
(a)(1) Whenever a recipient of benefits under § 23-89-202(1) and (2)
recovers in tort for injury, either by settlement or judgment, the insurer
paying the benefits has a right of reimbursement and credit out of the tort
recovery or settlement, less the cost of collection, as defined.
(b)(2) An insurer shall have a lien upon the recovery to the
extent of the insurer's benefit payments.
(3) If a recipient of benefits under § 23-89-202(1) does not
pursue recovery against a liable third party, an insurer shall have a right
of subrogation.
*ANS046*
01/21/2025 2:51:07 PM ANS046

HB1381
(4) All cost of collection thereof shall be assessed against the
insurer and insured in the proportion each benefits from the recovery.
(c) The insurer shall have a lien upon the recovery to the extent of
its benefit payments.
(d)(5) The An insurer for the party who is liable in damages to
the injured party shall not condition settlement or payment of a judgment in
favor of the injured party upon issuing a single check jointly to the injured
party and the injured party's insurance company.
(b) The common law doctrine that requires a party to be made whole
before an insurer is reimbursed or is able to subrogate does not apply to the
recovery of an insurer under this section.
(c) This subchapter does not apply to, modify, or abrogate the rights
and obligations under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.























01/21/2025 2:51:07 PM ANS046